Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2046XS (1) 91 lh/ko S.F. 202 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 155A.49 Accessible 1 prescription-related measures for persons who are blind, 2 visually impaired, or otherwise have print disabilities ââ rules. 3 1. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 4 to ensure that no later than October 31, 2025, a person who 5 is blind, has a visual impairment, or otherwise has a print 6 disability has appropriate access to prescription drug labels, 7 bag tags, and medical guides. The accessibility measures shall 8 meet all of the following requirements: 9 a. Be provided at no additional cost to such persons. 10 b. Provide information in a format that is fully accessible 11 to a person who is blind, has a visual impairment, or otherwise 12 has a print disability. 13 c. Provide information to a person who is blind, has a 14 visual impairment, or otherwise has a print disability within 15 a time frame comparable to the time frame within which the 16 information is provided to a person who is not blind, does not 17 have a visual impairment, or does not otherwise have a print 18 disability. 19 2. In adopting rules under this section, the board shall 20 solicit input from persons who are blind, have a visual 21 impairment, or otherwise have a print disability. 22 3. The rules adopted under this section shall meet all of 23 the following requirements: 24 a. Comply with the guidelines and recommendations in the 25 United States government accountability office report published 26 in December 2016, entitled âPrescription Drug Labels: Actions 27 Needed to Increase Awareness of Best Practices for Accessible 28 Labels for Individuals Who are Blind or Visually Impairedâ. 29 b. Include a method for providing notice to the public 30 that accessible prescription drug labels, bag tags, and 31 medical guides are available, including notice regarding the 32 availability of the prescription drug labels, bag tags, and 33 medical guides in audio format. 34 4. The board shall submit a report to the governor and the 35 -1- LSB 2046XS (1) 91 lh/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 202 general assembly by January 1, 2026, which includes information 1 regarding progress in the implementation of the rules, 2 recommendations regarding additional measures for improving 3 accessibility, and projected costs of implementing enhanced 4 dispensing fees to defray the costs of providing accessible 5 prescription drug labels, bag tags, and medical guides to 6 persons who are blind, have a visual impairment, or otherwise 7 have a print disability. 8